pt-BR: Touca de natação estilo: Bolha/Turbante; Tecido revestido; Cúpula/Corrida; Cobertura para as orelhas; Bolsos de proteção para orelhas; Tecido/Malha; Novidade infantil; Cabelo comprido/Volume extra; Novidade/Personagem; Design para rabo de cavalo; Dupla face; Padrão; Aderência texturizada; Isolamento térmico; Neoprene térmico; Floral vintage; Viseira/Com aba; Outro
cs: Styl plavecké čepice: Bublinková/turban; Potažená látka; Kopulovitá/závodní; S krytím uší; Kapsy na ochranu uší; Látková/síťovaná; Dětské s motivem; Dlouhé vlasy / extra objem; Motiv postaviček / nevšední design; S otvorem pro culík; Oboustranná; Standardní; Texturovaný povrch; Tepelně izolovaná; Zateplená neoprenová; Vintage květinový; S kšiltem / okrajovou stříškou; Jiné
nl: Badmuts stijl: Noppen/tulband; Gecoate stof; Bol/racing; Oorbedekkend; Oorbeschermingsvakjes; Stof/mesh; Novelty (kinderen); Lang haar/extra volume; Novelty/personage; Ontwerp voor paardenstaart; Omkeerbaar; Standaard; Grip met textuur; Thermisch geïsoleerd; Thermisch neopreen; Vintage bloemenprint; Zonneklep/met rand; Overig
el: Στυλ σκουφιού κολύμβησης: Φούσκα/Τουρμπάνι; Ύφασμα με επίστρωση; Θόλος/Αγωνιστικό; Κάλυψη αυτιών; Θήκες προστασίας αυτιών; Ύφασμα/Δίχτυ; Παιδικό με σχέδια; Μακριά μαλλιά/Έξτρα όγκος; Σχέδια/Χαρακτήρες; Σχέδιο για αλογοουρά; Διπλής όψης; Τυπικό; Ανάγλυφο κράτημα; Θερμομονωτικό; Θερμικό νεοπρένιο; Vintage φλοράλ; Με γείσο; Άλλο
ru: Стиль шапочки для плавания: Пузырчатая/тюрбан; Ткань с покрытием; Купольная/стартовая; Закрывающая уши; С карманами для защиты ушей; Тканевая/сетчатая; Детская фантазийная; Для длинных волос/дополнительный объем; Фантазийная/с персонажами; С отделением для хвоста; Двусторонняя; Стандартная; Текстурированная внутри; Теплоизолированная; Термонеопреновая; Винтажная с цветами; С козырьком/полями; Другое
tr: Yüzme bonesi tarzı: Büzgülü/Tülbent; Kaplamalı kumaş; Kubbe/Yarış; Kulak korumalı; Kulak koruyucu cepli; Kumaş/File; Çocuk/İlginç tasarım; Uzun saç/Ekstra hacim; İlginç tasarım/Karakter; Atkuyruğu tasarımlı; Çift taraflı; Standart; Dokulu tutuş; Isı yalıtımlı; Termal neopren; Vintage çiçekli; Siperlikli/Kenarlı; Diğer
fi: Uimalakin malli: Kupla/turbaani; Pinnoitettu kangas; Kupoli/kilpauinti; Korvat peittävä; Korvasuojataskut; Kangas/verkko; Lasten kuviollinen; Pitkille hiuksille / lisätilavuutta; Kuviollinen/hahmo; Poninhäntämalli; Käännettävä; Vakio; Teksturoitu pito; Lämpöeristetty; Lämpöneopreeni; Vintage-kukkakuvio; Visiirillinen/lipallinen; Muu
pt-PT: Estilo da touca de natação: Bolha/turbante; Tecido revestido; Cúpula/corrida; Cobertura de orelhas; Bolsos de proteção auricular; Tecido/rede; Novidade para crianças; Cabelo comprido/volume extra; Novidade/personagem; Design para rabo de cavalo; Reversível; Padrão; Pega texturada; Isolamento térmico; Neopreno térmico; Floral vintage; Viseira/com aba; Outro
hr-HR: Stil kape za plivanje: S mjehurićima / turban; Obložena tkanina; Kupolasta/trkaća; S pokrivalom za uši; Džepovi za zaštitu ušiju; Tkanina/mreža; Zabavna dječja; Duga kosa / dodatni volumen; Zabavna / s likom; Dizajn za konjski rep; Dvostrana; Standardna; Teksturirani hvat; Toplinski izolirana; Toplinski neopren; Starinski cvjetni uzorak; Šilt/obod; Ostalo
ro-RO: Stil de cască de înot: Cu bule/Turban; Material textil acoperit; Cupolă/Competiție; Acoperire urechi; Buzunare de protecție pentru urechi; Material textil/Plasă; Modele amuzante pentru copii; Păr lung/Volum extra; Modele amuzante/Personaje; Design pentru coadă de cal; Reversibil; Standard; Prindere texturată; Izolat termic; Neopren termic; Floral vintage; Cu vizieră/bor; Altele
sk-SK: Štýl plaveckej čiapky: Bublinková/Turban; Potiahnutá tkanina; Kopula/závodná; Zakrývajúca uši; Vrecká na ochranu uší; Tkanina/sieťovina; Detská s motívom; Pre dlhé vlasy/extra objem; S motívom/postavičkou; Pre chvost (Cop); Obojstranná; Štandardná; Štruktúrovaný povrch; Tepelne izolovaná; Termálny neoprén; Vintage kvetinová; So šiltom; Iný
ko: 수영모 형태: 버블/터번; 코팅 패브릭; 돔/레이싱; 귀 덮개; 귀 보호 주머니; 패브릭/메시; 아동용 노벨티; 긴 머리/엑스트라 볼륨; 노벨티/캐릭터; 포니테일 디자인; 리버서블; 스탠더드; 텍스처 그립; 보온 단열; 보온 네오프렌; 빈티지 플로럴; 바이저/챙; 기타
sv: Badmössans stil: Bubbel/turban; Belagt tyg; Kupol/tävling; Örontäckande; Öronskyddsfickor; Tyg/nät; Lekfull (barn); Långt hår/extra volym; Figur/lekfull; Hästsvansdesign; Vändbar; Standard; Strukturerat grepp; Värmeisolerad; Termisk neopren; Vintageblommig; Skärm/brätte; Annan
th: สไตล์หมวกว่ายน้ำ: บับเบิล/ผ้าโพกหัว; ผ้าเคลือบ; โดม/แข่ง; คลุมหู; ช่องป้องกันหู; ผ้า/ตาข่าย; เด็กแบบแปลกใหม่; ผมยาว/เพิ่มปริมาตร; แบบแปลกใหม่/ตัวละคร; ดีไซน์ผมหางม้า; สลับด้านได้; มาตรฐาน; จับกระชับแบบมีพื้นผิว; หุ้มฉนวนความร้อน; เทอร์มอลนีโอพรีน; วินเทจฟลอรัล; หมวกไวเซอร์/มีปีก; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu mũ bơi: Bong bóng/Turban; Vải phủ; Mái vòm/Đua; Che tai; Túi bảo vệ tai; Vải/Lưới; Kiểu mới lạ cho trẻ em; Tóc dài/Siêu bồng; Mới lạ/Nhân vật; Thiết kế buộc đuôi ngựa; Có thể lộn ngược; Tiêu chuẩn; Bám dính có gân; Cách nhiệt; Neoprene giữ nhiệt; Hoa vintage; Lưỡi trai/Có vành; Khác
zh-CN: 泳帽款式: 泡泡帽/头巾帽; 涂层织物; 圆顶/竞速; 护耳式; 护耳袋; 织物/网眼; 儿童趣味款; 长发/大容量款; 趣味/角色款; 马尾辫设计; 双面可用; 标准款; 防滑纹理; 隔热保暖; 隔热氯丁橡胶; 复古碎花; 遮阳/带帽沿; 其他
es: Estilo del gorro de natación: Burbuja/turbante; Tela recubierta; Domo/carreras; Cubre orejas; Bolsillos de protección para orejas; Tela/malla; Novedad infantil; Cabello largo/volumen extra; Novedad/personajes; Diseño para coleta; Reversible; Estándar; Agarre texturizado; Aislamiento térmico; Neopreno térmico; Floral vintage; Visera/con ala; Otro
da: Badehættestil: Boble/turban; Overfladebehandlet stof; Kuppel/konkurrence; Øredækkende; Lommer til ørebeskyttelse; Stof/mesh; Motiver til børn; Langt hår/ekstra volumen; Sjove motiver/figurer; Design til hestehale; Vendbar; Standard; Tekstureret greb; Varmeisoleret; Termisk neopren; Vintage blomstret; Skygge/kant; Andet
pl: Styl czepka pływackiego: Bąbelkowy / turban; Tkanina powlekana; Kopułowy / wyścigowy; Zakrywający uszy; Kieszonki chroniące uszy; Z materiału / siateczki; Dziecięcy, fantazyjny; Do długich włosów / powiększony; Fantazyjny / z postaciami; Z miejscem na kucyk; Dwustronny; Standardowy; Z teksturowanym uchwytem; Termoizolacyjny; Z neoprenu termicznego; W stylu vintage, w kwiaty; Z daszkiem; Inny
it: Stile della cuffia da nuoto: A bolle/Turbante; Tessuto rivestito; A cupola/Da gara; Copriorecchie; Tasche per la protezione delle orecchie; Tessuto/Rete; Fantasia per bambini; Capelli lunghi/Volume extra; Fantasia/Personaggi; Design per coda di cavallo; Reversibile; Standard; Presa texturizzata; Isolamento termico; Neoprene termico; Floreale vintage; Con visiera/A tesa; Altro
de: Stil der Badekappe: Noppen/Turban; Beschichteter Stoff; Kuppel/Racing; Ohrenbedeckend; Ohrenschutztaschen; Stoff/Mesh; Motiv (Kinder); Langes Haar/Extra Volumen; Motiv/Charakter; Pferdeschwanz-Design; Wende-Design; Standard; Strukturierter Halt; Thermisch isoliert; Thermo-Neopren; Vintage-Blumenmuster; Schirm/Krempe; Sonstige
lt-LT: Plaukimo kepuraitės tipas: Burbulo tipo / turbanas; Dengtas audinys; Kupolo formos / varžybinė; Uždengianti ausis; Kišenėlės ausų apsaugai; Audinys / tinklelis; Vaikiška; Ilgiems plaukams / papildoma apimtis; Originali / su personažais; Pritaikyta surištiems plaukams; Dvipusė; Standartinė; Tekstūruotas paviršius; Šilumą sulaikanti; Šilumą sulaikantis neoprenas; Vintažinė gėlėta; Su snapeliu / kraštais; Kita
sl-SI: Slog plavalne kape: Kapa z mehurčki/turban; Tkanina s premazom; Kupolasta/tekmovalna; S pokritimi ušesi; Žepki za zaščito ušes; Tkanina/mrežica; Za otroke (zabavna); Za dolge lase/dodaten volumen; Zabavna/lik; Za čop; Obojestranska; Standardna; Teksturiran oprijem; Toplotno izolirana; Toplotni neopren; Vintage cvetlična; S senčnikom/krajcem; Drugo
nb: Badehettestil: Boble/turban; Belagt stoff; Kuppel/racing; Øredekkende; Ørebeskyttelseslommer; Stoff/netting; Morsomt for barn; Langt hår/ekstra volum; Morsom/figur; Hestehaledesign; Vendbar; Standard; Teksturert grep; Varmeisolert; Termisk neopren; Vintage blomster; Skjerm/brem; Annet
fr: Type de bonnet de bain: Bulle/turban; Tissu enduit; Dôme/course; Couvre-oreilles; Poches de protection des oreilles; Tissu/maille; Fantaisie pour enfants; Cheveux longs/volume supplémentaire; Fantaisie/personnage; Design pour queue de cheval; Réversible; Standard; Prise texturée; Isolation thermique; Néoprène thermique; Floral vintage; À visière/à bord; Autre
en: Swim cap style: Bubble/Turban; Coated Fabric; Dome/Racing; Ear Covering; Ear Protection Pockets; Fabric/Mesh; Kids Novelty; Long Hair/Extra Volume; Novelty/Character; Ponytail Design; Reversible; Standard; Textured Grip; Thermal Insulated; Thermal Neoprene; Vintage Floral; Visor/Brimmed; Other
zh-TW: 泳帽樣式: 泡泡/頭巾式; 塗層布料; 圓頂/競速款; 護耳款; 護耳口袋; 布料/網眼; 兒童趣味款; 長髮/大容量款; 趣味/卡通角色款; 馬尾設計; 雙面穿戴; 標準款; 紋理防滑設計; 保溫隔熱; 保溫氯丁橡膠; 復古碎花; 遮陽/寬沿款; 其他
ja: スイムキャップスタイル: バブル/ターバン; コーティングファブリック; ドーム/レーシング; イヤーカバー; イヤープロテクションポケット; ファブリック/メッシュ; キッズノベルティ; ロングヘア/エクストラボリューム; ノベルティ/キャラクター; ポニーテールデザイン; リバーシブル; スタンダード; テクスチャードグリップ; 断熱材入り; サーマルネオプレン; ヴィンテージフローラル; バイザー/ツバ付き; その他
hu: Úszósapka stílusa: Buborékos / Turbán; Bevonatos szövet; Kupola / Verseny; Fülvédős; Fülvédő zsebes; Szövet / Háló; Gyerek (figurális); Hosszú hajhoz / Extra térfogatú; Figurális / Karakteres; Lófarokhoz való; Kifordítható; Standard; Texturált tapadófelület; Hőszigetelt; Termál neoprén; Vintage virágos; Napellenzős / Karimás; Egyéb
bg-BG: Стил на плувна шапка: С мехурчета/тюрбан; Тъкан с покритие; Купол/състезателна; Покриваща ушите; Джобове за защита на ушите; Текстил/мрежа; Детска нестандартна; За дълга коса/допълнителен обем; Нестандартна/с герой; Дизайн за конска опашка; Двулицева; Стандартна; Релефен захват; С термоизолация; Термален неопрен; Винтидж с цветя; С козирка/периферия; Друго